Hawaii, session 2026, GM1122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 286-102.3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [T] §286-102.3 [-}-] Commercial drivers under the age of
twenty-one. A person [is qualifiod—t-o] drive commercially
in the State in intrastate commerce if the person:
(1) Is at least [nineteen] eighteen years of age;
(2) Is in compliance with title 49 Code of Federal
Regulations[7—part 390-396,—subpart B,] parts 390
through 396, except section 391.11(b)(1) in the case
of an intrastate driver involved in intrastate
commerce in the State;
[-F3}- Only ■operates a category 3 vehicle as defined in
■seetrieft--2-8-6--lr&S--(b^-(-34-^
-(- 44-] (3) [Shall] Does not transport hazardous materials
[as-defined -in section 28 6-2] , nor passengers in a
school vehicle as defined in section 286-181; [and]
2026-3363 HB1696 CDl HMSO

Page 2 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(4) Has had a category 3 state driver's license for
the two years immediately preceding driving
commercially under this section, with the following
conditions:
(A) Has not had any license suspended, revoked, or
canceled; and
(B) Has not had any conviction for:
(i) Speeding excessively involving any speed of
fifteen miles per hour or more above the
speed limit;
(ii) Driving recklessly, as defined by state or
local law or regulation, including but not
limited to offenses of driving a motor
vehicle in wilful or wanton disregard for
the safety of person or property;
(iii) Making improper or erratic traffic lane
changes;
(iv) Following the vehicle ahead too closely; or
(v) Violating state or local law relating to
motor vehicle traffic control, excluding
2026-3363 HB1696 CDl HMSO


Page 3 H.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
parking violations, arising in connection
with a fatal accident[—]; and
(5) Is under twenty-one years of age and actively enrolled
in:
(A) A registered apprenticeship program as determined
by the department of labor and industrial
relations; provided that a driver under
twenty-one years of age shall not operate a
commercial motor vehicle outside the scope,
supervision, or duration of the approved training
or apprenticeship program; or
(B) A structured, on-the-job training program
administered by the person's employer; provided
that:
(i) The employer is primarily engaged in a
trade, business, or industry that requires
the operation of commercial motor vehicles
as an incidental and necessary function of
its operations, and not for the primary
purpose of providing commercial driver
training to the general public;
2026-3363 HB1696 GDI HMSO

ininHiiiiiiiHiiiiiii

Page 4 H.B. NO.
T2
h
C.D. 1
(ii) The training is provided solely to
individuals who are bona fide employees of
the employer and is directly related to the
employee's job duties;
(iii) The employer does not offer, market, or
provide commercial driver training services
to the general public for a fee;
(iv) The training includes a minimum of three
hundred twenty hours of supervised, behind-
the-wheel and related instruction;
(v) The employer maintains written training
standards, safety protocols, and records of
training hours and supervision; and
(vi) The driver shall not operate a commercial
motor vehicle outside the scope,
supervision, or duration of the employer's
training program.
For the purposes of this paragraph, "registered
apprenticeship program" means a program approved or
recognized by, or registered with, the department of labor
and industrial relations, including programs registered
2026-3363 HB1696 CDl HMSO
■iHnniiiiiniiHiM

Page 5 H.B. NO. 1696
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
pursuant to chapter 372 or other workforce development
programs authorized by the department of labor and
industrial relations."
SECTION 2. Section 286-236, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§286-236 Commercial driver's license qualification
standards. (a) No person shall be issued a commercial driver's
license unless that person:
(1) Meets the qualification standards of title 49 Code of
Federal Regulations[—] part 391, subparts B and E;
provided that for issuance of a commercial driver's
license to an applicant who is eighteen years of age
or older but under twenty-one years of age, compliance
with title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section
391.11(b) (1), minimum age, shall not be required if
the license is restricted to intrastate operation
pursuant to subsection (i);
(2) Has passed a knowledge and driving skills test for
driving a commercial motor vehicle that complies with
minimum federal standards established by federal
2026-3363 HB1696 CDl HMSO

Page 6 H.B. NO. 1696
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
regulation enumerated in title 49 Code of Federal
Regulations[—] part 383, subparts G and H;
(3) Has Hawaii as the state of domicile as defined in
title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 383.5;
and
(4) Has satisfied all other requirements of the Commercial
Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986, Public Law 99-570,
title XII, in addition to other requirements imposed
by state law or federal regulation.
The tests shall be prescribed by the director and administered
by the respective county examiner of drivers. The test
examiners shall communicate with the applicant only in English
during the skills test. As of January 30, 2012, the examiner of
drivers shall verify that the medical certification status of a
driver who self-certified according to title 49 Code of Federal
Regulations section 383.71(b)(1)(i), non-excepted interstate, is
certified. If a driver submits a current medical examiner's
certificate, the examiner of drivers shall date-stamp the
certificate and post all required information to the commercial
driver's license information system pursuant to title 49 Code of
Federal Regulations section 383.73(b)(5) and in accordance with
2026-3363 HB1696 CDl HMSO

IIIHIIIiNlllliliigOIHIIII

Page 7 H.B. NO.
T2
h
C.D. 1
title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 383.73(o). A
person who is not physically qualified to drive under title 49
Code of Federal Regulations section 391.41(b)(1) or (2) and who
is otherwise qualified to drive a motor vehicle may be granted
an intrastate waiver by the director. The process for granting
intrastate waivers shall be the same as that for interstate
waivers in title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 391.49;
provided that the intrastate waiver requests shall be submitted
to the director.
(b) The examiner of drivers may waive the driving skills
test specified in this section for a commercial driver's license
applicant who meets the requirements of title 49 Code of Federal
Regulations section 383.77 or 383.123(b).
(c) A commercial driver's license or commercial learner's
permit, including a provisional or temporary license or permit,
shall not be issued to a person while the person is subject to a
disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle, or
while the person's driver's license is suspended, revoked, or
canceled in any state; or while the person holds a driver's
license issued by any other state unless the person first
surrenders that license.
2026-3363 HB1696 CDl HMSO

HHIIIIIIHnillilllllllllll

Page 8 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(d) A commercial learner's permit may be issued to an
individual who holds a valid driver's license, is at least
eighteen years of age, meets the qualification standards of
title 49 Code of Federal Regulations[—] part 391, subparts B and
E, and has passed the written tests required for the desired
class of a commercial driver's license.
(e) The commercial learner's permit shall not be valid for
a period in excess of one hundred eighty days from the date that
the applicant passes the general and all required endorsement
knowledge tests; provided that, if the applicant is not required
to take a knowledge test, the period shall start when the permit
is issued. When driving a commercial motor vehicle, the holder
of a commercial leainer's permit shall be accompanied by a
person with a valid commercial driver's license to operate that
category of commercial motor vehicle with the proper
endorsements. The licensed person shall occupy the seat beside
the individual for the purpose of giving instruction in driving
the commercial motor vehicle. The commercial learner's permit
may be renewed no more than an additional one hundred eighty
days without requiring the commercial learner's permit holder to
retake the general or endorsement knowledge tests, and the
2026-3363 HB1696 CDl HMSO

Page 9 H.B. NO.
T2
h
C.D. 1
applicant requalifies meeting the requirements of subsection
(d). The commercial learner's permit holder [is] shall be
eligible to take the commercial driver's license skills test no
earlier than fourteen days after obtaining the permit.
(f) The examiner of drivers may waive the knowledge and
skills tests specified in this section for any person who is at
least twenty-one years of age and who possesses a valid
commercial driver's license issued by any state of the United
States, Mexico, or a province of Canada that issues licenses in
accordance with the minimum federal standards for the issuance
of commercial driver's licenses. The examiner of drivers shall
accept the test scores of a Hawaii commercial learner's permit
holder who completes training in another state in the United
States and is tested in compliance with federal motor carrier
safety regulations by that state in association with the
training. The testing state shall electronically transmit in a
secure manner the skills test results directly to the examiner
of drivers, and if the applicant passed, and meets all other
requirements, a Hawaii commercial driver's license shall be
issued. To retain a hazardous materials endorsement, the
applicant shall pass the knowledge test for a hazardous
2026-3363 HB1696 GDI HMSO
IIHillllllHIliniilllM

Page 10 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
materials endorsement and be determined by the federal
Transportation Security Administration not to pose a security
risk warranting denial of the endorsement.
(g) Every applicant shall successfully complete the
commercial driver's license general knowledge test before being
issued a commercial learner's permit. A driver holding a valid
commercial driver's license who seeks an upgrade for which a
skills test is required shall also pass the appropriate
knowledge test before obtaining a commercial learner's permit.
Beginning February 7, 2022, except for a driver holding a valid
commercial driver's license or commercial learner's permit that
was obtained before February 7, 2022, every applicant shall
complete the entry-level driver training requirements as
specified in title 49 Code of Federal Regulations part 380,
subpart F, and be verified with the Federal Motor Carrier Safety
Administration Training Provider Registry before taking the
skills test for a class A or class B commercial driver's
license, passenger endorsement, or school bus endorsement, and
before taking the knowledge test for a hazardous materials
endorsement.
2026-3363 HB1696 CDl HMSO


Page 11 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(h) Beginning November 18, 2024, the examiner of drivers
shall not issue, renew, transfer, or upgrade a commercial
driver's license; renew the hazardous materials endorsement; or
issue, renew, or upgrade a commercial learner's permit; if the
results of a query to the Federal Motor Carrier Safety
Administration's Drug and Alcohol Clearinghouse is that the
driver is prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle.
(i) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(1) and title 49 Code of
Federal Regulations section 391.11(b)(1), the examiner of
drivers may issue a commercial driver's license to a person who
is eighteen years of age or older but under twenty-one years of
age if:
(1) The license bears the "K" restriction indicating
operation is limited to intrastate commerce, as
described in section 286-239 (b) (3);
(2) The applicant meets all other state and federal
requirements applicable to the license class and
endorsements sought, including medical certification
(49 C.F.R. part 391), entry-level driver training (49
C.F.R. part 380), Icnowledge and sl<.ills testing (49
2026-3363 HB1696 CDl HMSO

iiiiHiifflDHiiiiiHiinnn

Page 12 H.B. NO. 1696
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
C.F.R. part 383), and controlled substances and
alcohol use and testing (49 C.F.R. part 382); and
(3) The applicant demonstrates enrollment in or completion
of a training program authorized under section 286-
102.3(5) that may include:
(A) A registered apprenticeship program approved or
recognized by the department of labor and
industrial relations; or
(B) A structured, on-the-job training program
administered by the applicant's employer that
meets the requirements of section 286-
102.3(5) (B), including a minimum of three hundred
twenty hours of supervised, behind-the-wheel
instruction;
provided that employer-administered training shall not be
required as a condition of licensure where the applicant
qualifies through a registered apprenticeship program."
SECTION 3. The department of transportation shall adopt or
amend rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
necessary to lower the minimum age required for an intrastate
2026-3363 HB1696 CDl HMSO

iHHiHiMiiiiiiiinniniiniii

Page 13 H.B. NO. 1696
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
commercial driver's license to eighteen, consistent with this
Act.
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3363 HB1696 CDl HMSO

iniiiiiiiiiiyniiiiiiH

H.B. NO.
T2
h
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 21st day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1696, HD 2, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
---------
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1696, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
9-26